Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.251

Delivery to and filing of records by secretary of state—Effective time and date.

(1) A record authorized or required to be delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter must comply with the requirements of Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW. The secretary of state shall:

(a) For a statement of dissociation, send:

(i) A copy of the filed statement and a receipt for the fees to the person that the statement indicates has dissociated as a general partner; and

(ii) A copy of the filed statement and receipt to the limited partnership;

(b) For a statement of withdrawal, send:

(i) A copy of the filed statement and a receipt for the fees to the person on whose behalf the record was filed; and

(ii) If the statement refers to an existing limited partnership, a copy of the filed statement and receipt to the limited partnership; and

(c) For all other records, send a copy of the filed record and a receipt for the fees to the person on whose behalf the record was filed.

(2) A record delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter may specify an effective time and a delayed effective date in accordance with RCW 23.95.210. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a record filed by the secretary of state is effective as provided in RCW 23.95.210.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6112; 2009 c 188 s 206.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.